nb: Målrettet ansiktssone: Kinn; Hake; Panne; Fullt ansikt; Nese; T-sone; Annet
de: Zielgesichtszone: Wangen; Kinn; Stirn; Vollmaske; Nase; T-Zone; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Cieľová oblasť tváre: Líca; Brada; Čelo; Na celú tvár; Nos; T-zóna; Iné
lt-LT: Tikslinė veido zona: Skruostai; Smakras; Kakta; Viso veido; Nosis; T zona; Kita
pt-BR: Zona facial alvo: Bochechas; Queixo; Testa; Rosto completo; Nariz; Zona T; Outro
es: Zona facial objetivo: Mejillas; Mentón; Frente; Cara completa; Nariz; Zona T; Otros
hu: Célzott arczóna: Orcák; Áll; Homlok; Teljes maszk; Orr; T-zóna; Egyéb
pl: Obszar twarzy: Policzki; Broda; Czoło; Pełna maska; Nos; Strefa T; Inne
ru: Целевая зона лица: Щеки; Подбородок; Лоб; Все лицо; Нос; Т-зона; Другой
ja: ターゲット顔ゾーン: 頬; あご; 額; フルフェイス; 鼻; Tゾーン; その他
cs: Cílová obličejová zóna: Tváře; Brada; Čelo; Celý obličej; Nos; T-zóna; Jiné
zh-CN: 目标面部区域: 脸颊; 下巴; 前额; 全面罩; 鼻子; T 区; 其他
it: Zona facciale target: Guance; Mento; Fronte; Pieno facciale; Naso; Zona T; Altro
ro-RO: Zonă facială țintă: Obraji; Bărbie; Frunte; Toată fața; Nas; Zona T; Altele
fr: Zone cible du visage: Joues; Menton; Front; Visage complet; Nez; Zone T; Autre
pt-PT: Zona facial alvo: Bochechas; Queixo; Testa; Rosto completo; Nariz; Zona T; Outro
da: Målrettet ansigtsområde: Kinder; Hage; Pande; Fuldt ansigt; Næse; T-zone; Andet
tr: Hedef yüz bölgesi: Yanaklar; Çene; Alın; Tam yüz; Burun; T bölgesi; Diğer
vi: Vùng mặt mục tiêu: Má; Cằm; Trán; Kín mặt; Mũi; Vùng chữ T; Khác
bg-BG: Целева лицева зона: Бузи; Брадичка; Чело; Цяло лице; Нос; Т-зона; Други
fi: Kohdennettu kasvojen alue: Posket; Leuka; Otsa; Koko kasvot peittävä; Nenä; T-alue; Muu
ko: 대상 얼굴 부위: 볼; 턱; 이마; 풀 페이스; 코; T존; 기타
hr-HR: Ciljana zona lica: Obrazi; Brada; Čelo; Cijelo lice; Nos; T-zona; Ostalo
sl-SI: Ciljna obrazna cona: Lica; Brada; Čelo; Cel obraz; Nos; T-cona; Drugo
sv: Målzon i ansiktet: Kinder; Haka; Panna; Hela ansiktet; Näsa; T-zon; Övrigt
th: โซนใบหน้าเป้าหมาย: แก้ม; คาง; หน้าผาก; หน้ากากแบบครอบจมูกและปาก; จมูก; โซนที; อื่นๆ
nl: Doelgebied gezicht: Wangen; Kin; Voorhoofd; Volledig gezicht; Neus; T-zone; Andere
en: Target facial zone: Cheeks; Chin; Forehead; Full face; Nose; T-zone; Other
el: Στοχευμένη ζώνη προσώπου: Μάγουλα; Πηγούνι; Μέτωπο; Ολόκληρου προσώπου; Μύτη; Ζώνη Τ; Άλλο
zh-TW: 目標臉部區域: 臉頰; 下巴; 額頭; 全臉; 鼻子; T字部位; 其他